Idaho, session 2026, S1442.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Idaho Refugee and Illegal Alien Accountability Act."
SECTION 2. That Chapter 4, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-467, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-467. AUDIT OF REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Entity" means any corporation and foreign corporation; business
corporation and foreign business corporation; for-profit and nonprofit
unincorporated association; corporation sole; business trust, estate,
partnership, trust, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common
economic interest; and a state, the United States, and a foreign govern-
ment.
(b) "Illegal alien" means a person who is not lawfully present in the
United States.
(c) "Refugee" is as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(42).
(d) "Resettlement services" means any service provided by an entity
that entered into a grant, contract, or cooperative agreement with the
United States department of state or other appropriate federal agency
to provide for the reception and initial placement of refugees in the
United States.
(2) Any entity incorporated under the laws of the state of Idaho pro-
viding resettlement services for refugees shall provide the legislature an
annual audit of such services in accordance with the provisions of sections
67-466 and 67-705, Idaho Code.
(3) Such audit shall detail the following:
(a) The total number of refugees served;
(b) The nationality and gender of refugees served;
(c) The language abilities of refugees served;
(d) The successful rate of participation in language remediation pro-
gramming for refugees served;
(e) The counties and municipalities where refugees served are housed;


(f) The housing units taken by refugees served; and
(g) The vital statistics, including the rates of communicable disease,
among refugees served.
(4) Any entity incorporated under the laws of the state of Idaho pro-
viding resettlement services for refugees is prohibited from harboring or
concealing an illegal alien, transporting an illegal alien in furtherance of
remaining unlawfully in the United States, or encouraging or inducing an il-
legal alien to remain in the United States unlawfully.
(5) Any entity providing refugee resettlement services to illegal
aliens shall account for the names and identifying demographics of such
aliens for the purposes of providing a catalog of names that may be matched
against federal immigration databases at the department of homeland secu-
rity, department of health and human services, and department of state.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 30, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3015, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3015. IMMIGRATION STATUS AND NATIONALITY OF ARRESTED INDIVIDU-
ALS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administration of criminal justice" means performance of any
of the following activities: detection, apprehension, detention,
pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication,
correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or
criminal offenders. The administration of criminal justice shall in-
clude criminal identification activities and the collection, storage,
and dissemination of criminal history record information.
(b) "Arrest" is as defined in section 19-601, Idaho Code.
(c) "Illegal alien" means a person who is not lawfully present in the
United States.
(d) "Immigration status" means a person's legal right to be in the
United States or lack thereof.
(e) "Law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement agency of the
state or any political subdivision of the state, including the Idaho
state police and any municipal police department or county sheriff's
office.
(2) In the performance of the administration of criminal justice, all
law enforcement agencies shall, consistent with the provisions of section
18-9008, Idaho Code, verify and record the immigration status and national-
ity of any arrested individual.
(3) No later than October 1, 2026, each local, county, and state law en-
forcement agency shall file with the state controller a biannual report con-
taining: the immigration status and nationality of persons arrested; crime
statistics related to illegal aliens arrested in Idaho, including the num-
ber of illegal aliens transferred to federal officials; the crimes for which
such persons were arrested, if any; and any reason for noncompliance with the
provisions of this section, if applicable. The state controller shall make
such report available for inspection at all times on the website of the state
controller.
(4) If the attorney general determines that a local, county, or state
law enforcement agency is not in compliance with the provisions of this sec-


tion, he shall notify such agency of its noncompliance and that it has thirty
(30) days to cure the violation. If the law enforcement agency fails to cure
its noncompliance within thirty (30) days, the attorney general may seek
injunctive relief against the agency, and the agency may be subject to the
withholding of state funding by the legislature.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.